Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1663.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding an article to read:ARTICLE XXIII-BSTATEWIDE IMAGINATION LIBRARY CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM Section 2301-B. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this article shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617181920 "Account." The Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM of Pennsylvania Restricted Account established under section 2302-B."CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM PARTNER." A NONPROFIT ENTITY QUALIFIED UNDER 26 U.S.C. § 501(C)(3) (RELATING TO EXEMPTION FROM TAX ON CORPORATIONS, CERTAIN TRUSTS, ETC.) AND ORGANIZED SOLELY TO PROMOTE AND ENCOURAGE READING BY CHILDREN."Department." The Department of Education of the Commonwealth."Eligible child." A child who resides within the Commonwealth and is under five years of age."Program." The Statewide Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY Program established under section 2303-B. "Qualified local entity." An existing or new local Dolly Parton's Imagination Library program partner PENNSYLVANIA-BASED PARTNER OF A CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM PARTNER . Section 2302-B. Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM of Pennsylvania Restricted Account.(a) Establishment.--The Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM of Pennsylvania Restricted Account is established as a restricted account in the General Fund. Money in the account is appropriated to the department on a continuing basis for the purposes of this article.(b) Funding.--The State Treasurer may accept appropriations, transfers, gifts, grants, donations, legacies or any other revenues, including allowable Federal funds, for deposit into the account.(c) Allocation.--Money from the account shall be allocated to qualified local entities that agree to a dollar-for-dollar match for purposes of the program. The department may waive the 20250HB1663PN2710 - 2 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 dollar-for-dollar match requirement for a qualified local entity on a case-by-case basis to prevent undue financial hardship.(d) Money shall not lapse.--Money remaining in the account at the close of the fiscal year shall not lapse but shall be carried forward to the next fiscal year and be continuously appropriated only for the purposes specified in this article.(e) Interest.--Any interest that accrues in the account shall remain in the account.Section 2303-B. Statewide Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY Program. (a) Establishment and purpose.--The Statewide Imagination Library CHILDREN'S LITERACY Program is established in the department to promote the development of a comprehensive Statewide initiative to encourage children from birth to five years of age ELIGIBLE CHILDREN to develop a love of reading and learning.(b) Providing books.--Qualified local entities shall use allocated money to provide one age-appropriate book to each registered child from birth to five years of age in participating counties ELIGIBLE CHILD IN THE QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITY'S SERVICE AREA . Books shall be sent monthly to each child's home at no cost to families. A BOOK PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT CONTAIN DEPICTIONS OF SEXUAL ACTIVITY, CHILD PORNOGRAPHY, PORNOGRAPHY, NUDITY OR SEXUAL CONDUCT, OR MATERIAL THAT IS OBSCENE AS DEFINED IN 18 PA.C.S. § 5903(B) (RELATING TO OBSCENE AND OTHER SEXUAL MATERIALS AND PERFORMANCES).(c) Matching.--In accordance with section 2302-B(c), the department, if money is available IN THE ACCOUNT , shall match the amount required of local programs QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES participating in the program.20250HB1663PN2710 - 3 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 2304-B. Duties of department.(a) Administration.--The department shall administer the program and shall coordinate with a nonprofit entity, qualified under 26 U.S.C. § 501(c)(3) (relating to exemption from tax on corporations, certain trusts, etc.), and organized solely to promote and encourage reading by the children of this Commonwealth, CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM PARTNER for the purpose of implementing this article.(b) Oversight.-- The SUBJECT TO AVAILABLE FUNDS IN THE ACCOUNT, THE department shall provide oversight to the nonprofit entity in subsection (a) A CHILDREN'S LITERACY PROGRAM PARTNER to do all of the following:(1) Manage the daily operations of the program.(2) Promote the Statewide development of local Dolly Parton's Imagination Library programs QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES . (3) Advance and strengthen local Dolly Parton's Imagination Library programs QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES . (4) Develop community engagement initiatives.(5) Develop, promote and coordinate a public awareness campaign to make donors aware of the opportunity to donate to the affiliate programs and make the public aware of the opportunity to register eligible children to receive books through the program.(6) Administer the local match requirement and coordinate the collection and remittance of local program QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITY costs for books and mailing. (7) Develop Statewide marketing and communication plans.(8) Solicit donations, gifts and other funding to financially support local Dolly Parton's Imagination Library 20250HB1663PN2710 - 4 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 programs QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES . (c) Regulations GUIDELINES .--The department may promulgate regulations ISSUE GUIDELINES as needed for the administration of the program.Section 2305-B. Report.The department shall prepare and submit to the General Assembly, no later than January 1, 2026, and each January 1 thereafter, THE JANUARY 1 FOLLOWING THE END OF THE FISCAL YEAR IN WHICH FUNDS WERE ALLOCATED FROM THE ACCOUNT, a report that includes the following:(1) The deposits made to, and expenditures made from, the account.(2) Whether the department waived any local match requirements.(3) How many local programs QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES exist, where the programs are located and which entity or organization serves as the local partner THE NAME OF THE QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITY . (4) How many children are enrolled in a program REGISTERED BY QUALIFIED LOCAL ENTITIES and how many books those children have received.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1663PN2710 - 5 - <--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--<--12345678910111213141516171819202122